Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1114.
do enact as follows:SB1114,11Section 1. Chapter 156 of the statutes is created to read:SB1114,3,21CHAPTER 1562MEDICAL AID IN DYINGSB1114,3,43156.01 Short title. This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the 4“Our Care, Our Options Act.”SB1114,3,55156.03 Definitions. In this chapter:SB1114,3,66(1) “Adult” means an individual who is 18 years of age or older.SB1114,3,87(2) “Attending provider” means the provider who has primary responsibility 8for the care of an individual and treatment of that individual’s terminal disease.SB1114,3,109(3) “Coercion or undue influence” means the willful attempt, whether by 10deception, intimidation, or any other means, to do any of the following:SB1114,3,1211(a) Cause an individual to request, obtain, or self-administer medication 12under this chapter with intent to cause the death of the individual.SB1114,3,1413(b) Prevent a qualified individual from obtaining or self-administering 14medication under this chapter.SB1114,3,1715(4) “Consulting provider” means a provider who is qualified by specialty or 16experience to make a professional diagnosis and prognosis regarding an 17individual’s disease.SB1114,3,1818(5) “Department” means the department of health services.SB1114,3,2119(6) “Health care facility” means a general hospital, medical clinic, nursing 20home, or in-patient hospice facility or any other entity regulated under ch. 50. A 21health care facility does not include individual providers.SB1114,4,222(7) “Informed decision” means a decision by a qualified individual to request 23and obtain a prescription for medication under this chapter that the qualified 1individual may self-administer to bring about his or her peaceful death, after being 2fully informed by the individual’s attending provider of all of the following:SB1114,4,33(a) The individual’s diagnosis and prognosis.SB1114,4,44(b) The potential risks associated with taking the medication to be prescribed.SB1114,4,55(c) The probable result of taking the medication to be prescribed.SB1114,4,86(d) The feasible end-of-life care and treatment options for the individual’s 7terminal disease, including comfort care, palliative care, hospice care, and pain 8control, and the risks and benefits of each.SB1114,4,109(e) The individual’s right to withdraw a request under this chapter or consent 10for any other treatment at any time.SB1114,4,1411(8) Notwithstanding sub. (13), “licensed mental health care provider” means 12a psychiatrist, psychologist, clinical social worker, psychiatric nurse practitioner, 13clinical mental health counselor, or clinical professional counselor licensed, 14certified, or otherwise credentialed in this state.SB1114,4,1715(9) “Medical aid in dying” means the practice of evaluating a request, 16determining qualification, and providing a prescription to a qualified individual 17under this chapter.SB1114,4,2018(10) “Medically confirmed” means that a consulting provider, after 19performing a medical evaluation, has confirmed an attending provider’s medical 20opinion that an individual is eligible to receive medication under this chapter.SB1114,5,221(11) “Mentally capable” means that in the opinion of an attending provider or 22consulting provider, or a licensed mental health care provider if a determination is 1requested under s. 156.17, an individual requesting medication under this chapter 2has the ability to make and communicate an informed decision.SB1114,5,53(12) “Prognosis of 6 months or less” means an individual’s terminal disease 4will, within reasonable medical judgment, result in the death of that individual 5within 6 months.SB1114,5,96(13) “Provider” means a person licensed, certified, or otherwise authorized or 7permitted by this state to diagnose and treat medical conditions and prescribe and 8dispense medication, including controlled substances, but does not include a health 9care facility. Provider includes any of the following:SB1114,5,1010(a) A physician licensed under ch. 448.SB1114,5,1111(b) An advanced practice registered nurse, as defined in s. 154.01 (1g).SB1114,5,1212(c) A physician assistant licensed under subch. IX of ch. 448.SB1114,5,1613(14) “Qualified individual” means a mentally capable adult who has satisfied 14the requirements of this chapter in order to obtain a prescription for medication to 15bring about a peaceful death. No person will be considered a “qualified individual” 16under this chapter solely because of advanced age or disability.SB1114,5,2017(15) “Self-administer” means a qualified individual performs an affirmative, 18conscious, and voluntary act to ingest medication prescribed under this chapter to 19bring about the individual’s peaceful death. Self-administration does not include 20administration by intravenous or other parenteral injection or infusion.SB1114,5,2321(16) “Terminal disease” means an incurable and irreversible disease that has 22been medically confirmed and will, within reasonable medical judgment, produce 23death within 6 months.SB1114,6,41156.05 Informed consent. (1) Nothing in this chapter may be construed to 2limit the information a provider must provide to an individual in order to comply 3with the medical standard of care and with informed consent requirements under 4state law.SB1114,6,65(2) If a provider is unable or unwilling to fulfill a request for medication under 6this chapter, the provider shall proceed as required under s. 156.21 (2).SB1114,6,107(3) Failure by a provider to provide information about medical aid in dying to 8an individual who requests it, or failure to refer the individual to another provider 9who can provide the information upon request, shall constitute a failure to obtain 10informed consent for subsequent medical treatments.SB1114,6,1211156.07 Standard of care. (1) Care that complies with the requirements of 12this chapter meets the medical standard of care.SB1114,6,1513(2) Nothing in this chapter exempts a provider or other medical personnel 14from meeting the medical standard of care for the treatment of individuals with a 15terminal disease.SB1114,6,2016156.09 Qualification. (1) A mentally capable adult with a terminal disease 17and a prognosis of 6 months or less may request a prescription for medication under 18this chapter. A qualified individual shall have made an oral request and a written 19request, and reiterated the oral request to the individual’s attending provider no 20less than 15 days after making the initial oral request.SB1114,6,2321(2) The attending provider and consulting provider of a qualified individual 22shall have met each of their respective requirements as set forth in ss. 156.13 and 23156.15.SB1114,7,61(3) Notwithstanding sub. (1), if an individual’s attending provider has 2medically determined that the individual will, within reasonable medical 3judgment, die within 15 days after making an initial oral request under sub. (1), the 415-day waiting period set forth in sub. (1) is waived and the individual may 5reiterate the oral request to the attending provider as required under sub. (1) at any 6time after making the initial oral request. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb1114 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb1114 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1114 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB1114 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB1114: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting